Illinois, session 104th, HB4287.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Sections 1510 and 1575 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/1510)7    Sec. 1510. Definitions. In this Article:8    "Adjusting a claim for loss or damage covered by an 9insurance contract" means negotiating values, damages, or 10depreciation or applying the loss circumstances to insurance 11policy provisions.12    "Adjusting insurance claims" means representing an insured 13with an insurer for compensation and, while representing that 14insured, either negotiating values, damages, or depreciation 15or applying the loss circumstances to insurance policy 16provisions.17    "Business entity" means a corporation, association, 18partnership, limited liability company, limited liability 19partnership, or other legal entity. 20    "Compensation" includes, but is not limited to, the 21following:22        (1) any assignment of insurance proceeds or a 23    percentage of the insurance proceeds;  HB4287- 2 -LRB104 17112 BAB 30531 b1        (2) any agreement to make repairs for the amount of 2    the insurance proceeds payable; or3        (3) assertion of any lien against insurance proceeds 4    payable. 5    "Department" means the Department of Insurance. 6    "Director" means the Director of Insurance. 7    "Fingerprints" means an impression of the lines on the 8finger taken for the purpose of identification. The impression 9may be electronic or in ink converted to electronic format.10    "Home state" means the District of Columbia and any state 11or territory of the United States where the public adjuster's 12principal place of residence or principal place of business is 13located. If neither the state in which the public adjuster 14maintains the principal place of residence nor the state in 15which the public adjuster maintains the principal place of 16business has a substantially similar law governing public 17adjusters, the public adjuster may declare another state in 18which it becomes licensed and acts as a public adjuster to be 19the home state. 20    "Individual" means a natural person. 21    "Person" means an individual or a business entity. 22    "Public adjuster" means any person who, for compensation 23or any other thing of value on behalf of the insured:24        (i) acts, aids, or represents the insured solely in 25    relation to first party claims arising under insurance 26    contracts that insure the real or personal property of the   HB4287- 3 -LRB104 17112 BAB 30531 b1    insured, in adjusting an insurance a claim for loss or 2    damage covered by an insurance contract; 3        (ii) advertises for employment as a public adjuster of 4    insurance claims or solicits business or represents 5    himself or herself to the public as a public adjuster of 6    first party insurance claims for losses or damages arising 7    out of policies of insurance that insure real or personal 8    property; or 9        (iii) directly or indirectly solicits business, 10    investigates or adjusts losses, or advises an insured 11    about first party claims for losses or damages arising out 12    of policies of insurance that insure real or personal 13    property for another person engaged in the business of 14    adjusting losses or damages covered by an insurance policy 15    for the insured. 16    "Uniform individual application" means the current version 17of the National Association of Directors (NAIC) Uniform 18Individual Application for resident and nonresident 19individuals. 20    "Uniform business entity application" means the current 21version of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners 22(NAIC) Uniform Business Entity Application for resident and 23nonresident business entities. 24    "Webinar" means an online educational presentation during 25which a live and participating instructor and participating 26viewers, whose attendance is periodically verified throughout   HB4287- 4 -LRB104 17112 BAB 30531 b1the presentation, actively engage in discussion and in the 2submission and answering of questions. 3(Source: P.A. 102-135, eff. 7-23-21; 103-216, eff. 1-1-24.) 4    (215 ILCS 5/1575)5    Sec. 1575. Contract between public adjuster and insured.6    (a) Public adjusters shall ensure that all contracts for 7their services are in writing and contain the following terms:8        (1) legible full name of the adjuster signing the 9    contract, as specified in Department records;10        (2) permanent home state business address, email 11    address, and phone number;12        (3) license number;13        (4) title of "Public Adjuster Contract";14        (5) the insured's full name, street address, insurance 15    company name, and policy number, if known or upon 16    notification;17        (6) a description of the loss and its location;18        (7) description of services to be provided to the 19    insured;20        (8) signatures of the public adjuster and the insured;21        (9) date and time the contract was signed by the 22    public adjuster and date and time the contract was signed 23    by the insured;24        (10) attestation language stating that the public 25    adjuster is fully bonded pursuant to State law; and  HB4287- 5 -LRB104 17112 BAB 30531 b1        (11) full salary, fee, commission, compensation, or 2    other considerations the public adjuster is to receive for 3    services, including any applicable cap under Section 1570.4    (b) The contract may specify that the public adjuster 5shall be named as a co-payee on an insurer's payment of a 6claim.7        (1) If the compensation is based on a share of the 8    insurance settlement, the exact percentage shall be 9    specified.10        (2) Initial expenses to be reimbursed to the public 11    adjuster from the proceeds of the claim payment shall be 12    specified by type, with dollar estimates set forth in the 13    contract and with any additional expenses first approved 14    by the insured.15        (3) Compensation provisions in a public adjuster 16    contract shall not be redacted in any copy of the contract 17    provided to the Director.18    (c) If the insurer, not later than 5 business days after 19the date on which the loss is reported to the insurer, either 20pays or commits in writing to pay to the insured the policy 21limit of the insurance policy, the public adjuster shall:22        (1) not receive a commission consisting of a 23    percentage of the total amount paid by an insurer to 24    resolve a claim;25        (2) inform the insured that loss recovery amount might 26    not be increased by insurer; and  HB4287- 6 -LRB104 17112 BAB 30531 b1        (3) be entitled only to reasonable compensation from 2    the insured for services provided by the public adjuster 3    on behalf of the insured, based on the time spent on a 4    claim and expenses incurred by the public adjuster, until 5    the claim is paid or the insured receives a written 6    commitment to pay from the insurer.7    (d) A public adjuster shall provide the insured a written 8disclosure concerning any direct or indirect financial 9interest that the public adjuster has with any other party who 10is involved in any aspect of the claim, other than the salary, 11fee, commission, or other consideration established in the 12written contract with the insured, including, but not limited 13to, any ownership of or any compensation expected to be 14received from, any construction firm, salvage firm, building 15appraisal firm, board-up company, or any other firm that 16provides estimates for work, or that performs any work, in 17conjunction with damages caused by the insured loss on which 18the public adjuster is engaged. The word "firm" shall include 19any corporation, partnership, association, joint-stock 20company, or person.21    (e) A public adjuster contract may not contain any 22contract term that:23        (1) allows the public adjuster's percentage fee to be 24    collected when money is due from an insurance company, but 25    not paid, or that allows a public adjuster to collect the 26    entire fee from the first check issued by an insurance   HB4287- 7 -LRB104 17112 BAB 30531 b1    company, rather than as a percentage of each check issued 2    by an insurance company;3        (2) requires the insured to authorize an insurance 4    company to issue a check only in the name of the public 5    adjuster;6        (3) precludes a public adjuster or an insured from 7    pursuing civil remedies;8        (4) includes any hold harmless agreement that provides 9    indemnification to the public adjuster by the insured for 10    liability resulting from the public adjuster's negligence; 11    or12        (5) provides power of attorney by which the public 13    adjuster can act in the place and instead of the insured. 14    (f) The following provisions apply to a contract between a 15public adjuster and an insured:16        (1) Prior to the signing of the contract, the public 17    adjuster shall provide the insured with a separate signed 18    and dated disclosure document regarding the claim process 19    that states:20    "Property insurance policies obligate the insured to 21    present a claim to his or her insurance company for 22    consideration. There are 3 types of adjusters that could 23    be involved in that process. The definitions of the 3 24    types are as follows:25            (A) "Company adjuster" means the insurance 26        adjusters who are employees of an insurance company.   HB4287- 8 -LRB104 17112 BAB 30531 b1        They represent the interest of the insurance company 2        and are paid by the insurance company. They will not 3        charge you a fee.4            (B) "Independent adjuster" means the insurance 5        adjusters who are hired on a contract basis by an 6        insurance company to represent the insurance company's 7        interest in the settlement of the claim. They are paid 8        by your insurance company. They will not charge you a 9        fee.10            (C) "Public adjuster" means the insurance 11        adjusters who do not work for any insurance company. 12        They represent the insured to assist in the 13        preparation, presentation, and settlement of the 14        claim. The insured hires them by signing a contract 15        agreeing to pay them a fee or commission based on a 16        percentage of the settlement, or other method of 17        compensation.".18        (2) The insured is not required to hire a public 19    adjuster to help the insured meet his or her obligations 20    under the policy, but has the right to do so.21        (3) The public adjuster is not a representative or 22    employee of the insurer or the Department of Insurance.23        (4) The salary, fee, commission, or other 24    consideration is the obligation of the insured, not the 25    insurer, except when rights have been assigned to the 26    public adjuster by the insured.  HB4287- 9 -LRB104 17112 BAB 30531 b1    (g) The contracts shall be executed in duplicate to 2provide an original contract to the public adjuster, and an 3original contract to the insured. The public adjuster's 4original contract shall be available at all times for 5inspection without notice by the Director.6    (h) The public adjuster shall provide the insurer or its 7authorized representative for receiving notice of loss or 8damage with an exact copy of the contract with the insured by 9email no later than 5 business days after execution of the 10contract, authorizing the public adjuster to represent the 11insured's interest.12    (i) The public adjuster shall give the insured written 13notice of the insured's rights as a consumer under the law of 14this State.15    (j) A public adjuster shall not provide services, other 16than emergency services, until a written contract with the 17insured has been executed, on a form filed with and approved by 18the Director, and an exact copy of the contract has been 19provided to the insurer or its authorized representative for 20receiving notice of loss or damage in accordance with 21subsection (h). At the option of the insured, any such 22contract shall be voidable for 5 business days after the 23contract is received by the insurer. The insured may void the 24contract by notifying the public adjuster in writing by (i) 25registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the 26address shown on the contract, (ii) personally serving the   HB4287- 10 -LRB104 17112 BAB 30531 b1notice on the public adjuster, or (iii) sending an email to the 2email address shown on the contract.3    (k) If the insured exercises the right to rescind the 4contract, anything of value given by the insured under the 5contract will be returned to the insured within 15 business 6days following the receipt by the public adjuster of the 7cancellation notice.8    (l) All contracts entered into that are in violation of 9this Section are void and invalid. 10(Source: P.A. 103-216, eff. 1-1-24.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.